Utah statutes.
31A-7-312.   Exclusive management and exclusive agency contracts.
Section 31A-5-417 applies to exclusive management and exclusive agency
contracts in corporations organized and operating under this chapter, except
that in this chapter, Subsection 31A-5-417 (2) does not preclude exclusive
agency contracts with controlled subsidiaries of the insurer organized and
operating under this chapter.
